Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-409
Hunting, fishing, and fur-harvesting permits; lost permit; replacement; fee.

The commission may issue a replacement permit for hunting, fishing, both hunting and fishing, or fur harvesting or for such other permits as may be issued by the commission to any person who has lost his or her original permit upon receipt from such person of satisfactory proof of purchase and an affidavit of loss of such original permit. The commission shall prescribe the procedures for applying for a replacement permit and may authorize electronic issuance. The commission may also designate agents to issue replacement permits pursuant to section 37-406. A fee of not more than five dollars, as established by the commission, shall be charged for the issuance of each replacement permit, except that no such fee shall be charged for replacement of any permits exempt from the payment of fees, lifetime permits, or permits issued under section 37-421 or 37-421.01.

Laws 1959, c. 151, § 1, p. 576;

Laws 1967, c. 216, § 3, p. 580;

Laws 1981, LB 72, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-204.01;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 119;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 21;

Laws 2001, LB 111, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB287, § 7.